Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB195.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 247 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Extension service" includes the University of Kentucky Cooperative
Extension Service or the Kentucky State University Cooperative Extension
Service;
(b) "Initiative" means the Kentucky Urban Youth Agriculture Initiative
established in this section;
(c) "Program" means any educational program that is part of the initiative;
and
(d) "Urban county" means a county with a population of one hundred fifty
thousand (150,000) or more according to the most recent federal decennial
census.
(2) There is hereby established the Kentucky Urban Youth Agriculture Initiative,
which shall be administered by the University of Kentucky Cooperative Extension
Service and the Kentucky State University Cooperative Extension Service and
their individual offices within the Commonwealth in partnership with other
organizations as appropriate. Beginning January 1, 2027, the extension service
shall initiate a pilot program in one (1) or more individual offices. Beginning
September 1, 2027, and as funding allows, the extension service may begin full
implementation and evaluation of the pilot program in all appropriate offices
throughout the Commonwealth, with potential program scaling and expansion to
begin September 1, 2028.
(3) The initiative shall:
(a) Promote farming, agriculture, agribusiness, and the efficient use of land in
Page 1 of 2
HB019510.100 - 808 - XXXX 3/18/2026 2:49 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS HB 195/GA
urban counties;
(b) Educate program participants on all aspects of farming, agriculture, and
agribusiness in an urban environment and encourage the adoption of urban
agriculture best practices;
(c) Develop participants' skills and knowledge to become informed agriculture
consumers and advocates; and
(d) Advance age-appropriate, experiential, or work-ready agricultural and
agribusiness programming, including formal internships and
apprenticeships.
(4) The length of each program term shall be one (1) year and each term shall begin
in September on a date specified by each extension service. Programs shall be
available to applicants at each extension service office located within or serving
an urban county of the Commonwealth. An office may work with an existing
state or local agricultural organization to better provide for the administration of
a program and the initiative.
(5) Each extension service office administering a program shall accept and review
applications from eligible applicants. Program participation shall be at the
discretion of each office and shall include as many participants as is practicable
on an annual basis. To be eligible to participate in a program, a participant shall:
(a) Be at least five (5) years of age and no more than eighteen (18) years of age;
(b) Have obtained parent or guardian permission to participate in accordance
with the extension service's youth protection policies; and
(c) Be available to participate in the program for the full duration of the term.
Page 2 of 2
HB019510.100 - 808 - XXXX 3/18/2026 2:49 PM GA